Utah statutes.
76-10-1229.   Distribution of pornographic material through cable television
prohibited -- Definitions -- Prosecution of violation.
(1) No person, including a franchisee, shall knowingly distribute by wire or
cable any pornographic or indecent material to its subscribers.
(2)  For purposes of this section "material" means any visual display shown on
a cable television system, whether or not accompanied by sound, or any sound
recording played on a cable television system.
(3)  For purposes of this section "pornographic material" is any material
defined as pornographic in sections 76-10-1201 and 76-10-1203.
(4)  For purposes of this section "indecent material" means any material
described in section 76-10-1227.
(5)  For purposes of this section "distribute" means to send, transmit,
retransmit, or otherwise pass through a cable television system.
(6)  Prosecution for violation of this section may be initiated at the
instance of the attorney general or any county or city attorney of an
interested political subdivision or at the instance of the governing body of
any such political subdivision.
(7)  Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
